Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 6. General Provisions.

Sec. 08.88.900.
Exceptions.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, this chapter does not apply to

a person who is not licensed under this chapter who manages or makes a real estate transaction with respect to real estate the person owns or is seeking to own so long as the compensation the person receives does not include any portion of the commission or other compensation paid to a real estate licensee in the transaction;

an attorney-in-fact under a power of attorney authorizing the consummation of a specific real estate transaction; an attorney-in-fact may not act as such under this paragraph for more than two transactions in a calendar year;

a lawyer performing duties as a lawyer;

a public official in the conduct of official duties;

a person acting as receiver, trustee, administrator, executor, or guardian;

a person acting under court order;

a person acting under the authority of a will or trust instrument;

a person dealing in mineral rights transactions;

an employee of a domestic or foreign corporation, general or limited partnership, or limited liability company when performing an act described in AS

08.88.161

incidental to the regular course of business when the act relates to the management, sale, or other disposition of real estate owned by the foreign or domestic corporation, general or limited partnership or limited liability company; the exemption under this paragraph does not apply to a person employed by a foreign or domestic corporation, partnership, limited partnership, or limited liability company who performs an act described in AS

08.88.161

either

as a vocation; or

for compensation if the amount of the compensation is dependent upon or directly related to the value of the real estate with respect to which the act is performed;

a person performing duties as a resident manager;

a bookkeeper or accountant performing bookkeeping or accounting functions;

a secretary or receptionist in a real estate office accepting rent or association fees and providing a written receipt for the rent or fees when a tenant or community association member delivers the rent or fees to the real estate office;

tradesmen or vendors of services performing maintenance and repair functions;

an employee of a real estate firm or of a property owner delivering or accepting a real estate contract or application, or a related amendment, to or from another person;

an individual assisting in the performance of real estate activities only by carrying out administrative, clerical, or maintenance tasks;

the management of a total of four or fewer residential units by a natural person for other persons;

community association management for property organized under AS 34.07 or AS 34.08 by a resident owner of a unit in the property if the owner is a member of a self-managed community association for the property;

community association management by a developer of property organized under AS 34.07 or AS 34.08 during the period that the developer retains control of at least 51 percent of the property;

an attorney-in-fact who, for a relative, acts under a power of attorney that authorizes the consummation of a specific real estate transaction; in this paragraph, “relative” means a spouse or a great grandparent, grandparent, parent, uncle, aunt, sibling, child, nephew, niece, grandchild, or great grandchild by the whole or half blood or by marriage but does not include a relative who is only related through a step relationship, such as a stepbrother or the child of a stepbrother, except that “relative” includes a stepchild;

a mobile home dealer; or

the management by a natural person of property for another person without a fee other than the reimbursement of expenses.

Notwithstanding that, under this section, a person is exempt from this chapter, AS

08.88.401(d)(1)

prohibits a licensee from knowingly paying to that person any part of a fee, commission, or other compensation received by the licensee in buying, selling, exchanging, leasing, auctioning, or renting real estate.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1964; am § 1 ch 38 SLA 1969; am § 19 ch 28 SLA 1974; am §§ 29 — 31 ch 167 SLA 1980; am § 14 ch 37 SLA 1986; am § 3 ch 133 SLA 1996; am §§ 47, 48 ch 45 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 72 SLA 1999)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly
AS

08.88.421

. Renumbered in 1987.

In 1998, the reference to “AS

08.88.401(d)(1)

” in subsection (b) was substituted for “AS

08.88.401(e)(1)

” to reflect the 1998 relettering of
AS

08.88.401(d)

— (g).

In 2010, under AS

01.05.031(b)

, the revisor of statutes substituted “attorney-in-fact” for “attorney in fact” in this section.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 12 AAC 64, art. 2.

Sec. 08.88.910.
Application to independent contractors.

The provisions of this chapter that apply to employment relationships and employees also apply to contracting relationships and independent contractors.

History.

(§ 49 ch 45 SLA 1998)

Sec. 08.88.990.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“commission” means the Real Estate Commission except where the context indicates that “commission” refers to a fee paid for personal services;

“community association management” means an activity undertaken for an owners’ association with regard to property organized under either AS 34.07 or AS 34.08 under an agreement in exchange for a fee, commission, or other valuable consideration, including the following activities: preparing budgets and other financial documents, collecting, controlling, or disbursing funds, obtaining insurance for the association, contracting for maintenance and repair to association property, and supervising the day-to-day operations of the association under the direction of the association’s board of directors;

“community association operating account” means an account in a financial institution maintained in the name of a specific community association that contains money used for day-to-day operation and not for other uses;

“community association reserve account” means an account in a financial institution maintained in the name of a specific community association that contains money reserved for the expected replacement cost of improvements within the community association or for other future uses;

“final arbitration award” means an arbitration award for which there is no further right to appeal;

“final judgment” means a judgment for which there is no further right to appeal;

“initial license”

means the first

real estate broker license that the commission issues to a person, even if the person previously received an associate real estate broker license or real estate salesperson license under this chapter;

associate real estate broker license that the commission issues to a person, even if the person previously received a real estate broker license or a real estate salesperson license under this chapter;

real estate salesperson license under this chapter that the commission issues to a person, even if the person previously received a real estate broker license or an associate real estate broker license under this chapter;

issuance of a license to an individual after the individual’s license has been revoked under AS

08.01.075

;

does not include the reinstatement of a license under AS

08.88.241(b)

;

“knowingly” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900(a)

;

“lease” includes a lease that is a part of another transaction;

“property management” is an activity undertaken for another with regard to real property under an agreement in exchange for a fee, commission, or other valuable consideration, including the following activities: marketing, leasing, contracting for physical, administrative, or financial maintenance, performance of overall management of real property, and the supervision of these actions;

“real estate” means an interest or estate in land, corporeal or incorporeal, except that it does not include a unit in a hotel, motel, boarding house, rooming house, or other transient lodging facility, or a unit in a warehouse, mini-storage facility, or other facility the function of which is limited to warehousing purposes;

“real estate licensee” is a person who holds a license under this chapter; the term includes a broker unless the context clearly excludes brokers;

“real estate transaction”

in sales, means the transfer or attempted transfer of an interest in a unit of real property, an act conducted as a result of or in pursuit of a contract to transfer an interest in a unit of real property, or an act conducted in an attempt to obtain a contract to market real property;

in property management, means the lease or rental of a unit of real property, including collection of rent from a tenant of a unit of rented or leased real property, an attempt to rent or lease a unit of real property, an attempt to collect rent from a tenant of rented or leased real property, or an act conducted as a result of or in pursuit of a contract to manage a unit of leased or rented real property;

in community association management, means the collection or attempted collection of dues from a unit owner or an activity conducted as a result of or in pursuit of a contract with a community association to manage the affairs of a community association;

“resident manager” means a person who resides on rented or leased real property or on contiguous property owned by the same owner, manages the property for the benefit of another person, and is either employed by the owner of the real estate or employed by, or under contract with, a real estate licensee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1964; am § 58 ch 218 SLA 1976; am §§ 32, 42 ch 167 SLA 1980; am §§ 50 — 53 ch 45 SLA 1998; am § 13 ch 74 SLA 2005; am § 23 ch 113 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

08.88.431

.
Renumbered in 1987 and 1998.
Also reorganized in 1987, 2005, and 2008 to alphabetize the defined terms.